Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1058
Cosmetology; licensure required.

It shall be unlawful for any person, group, company, or other entity to engage in any of the following acts without being duly licensed as required by the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, unless specifically excepted by such act:

(1) To engage in or follow or to advertise or hold oneself out as engaging in or following any of the practices of cosmetology or to act as a practitioner;

(2) To engage in or advertise or hold oneself out as engaging in the teaching of any of the practices of cosmetology; or

(3) To operate or advertise or hold oneself out as operating a cosmetology establishment in which any of the practices of cosmetology or the teaching of any of the practices of cosmetology are carried out.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 46;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-385;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 320;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 14.